Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-611
Precinct refunding bonds; payable to bearer; delivery; sale; price.

The said bonds shall be payable to bearer and may be delivered either to the holders and owners of the judgments for the payment of which they are issued, or may be sold under the direction of the county board and delivered to the purchasers and the proceeds used to pay the judgments; but the said funding bonds shall not be sold for less than their par value.

Laws 1901, c. 10, § 4, p. 62;

R.S.1913, § 434;

C.S.1922, § 351;

C.S.1929, § 11-610;

R.S.1943, § 10-611.